Arkansas, session 2025, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Monoclonal Antibodies for Immunization of
Respiratory Syncytial Virus Disease

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a policy
or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or
extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or 35
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, §
*ANS059*
11/25/2024 11:59:36 AM ANS059

HB1052
23-61-1001 et seq., or any successor program.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
8 and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
17 seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et
seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for 19
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(2)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(3) "Infant" means a child less than eight (8) months old; and
(4) "Respiratory syncytial virus disease" means a respiratory infection
of the nose, throat, and lungs caused by the respiratory syncytial virus.

11/25/2024 11:59:36 AM ANS059

HB1052
23-79-2902. Coverage for monoclonal antibodies for immunization —
Respiratory syncytial virus disease.
(a) Beginning on and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that
is offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or extended in this state shall
provide coverage for monoclonal antibodies for immunization of respiratory
syncytial virus disease of an infant under guidelines issued by the United
States Food and Drug Administration.
(b) The coverage for monoclonal antibodies for immunization of
respiratory syncytial virus disease of an infant under subsection (a) of this
section:
(1) Is not subject to an annual deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance limit as established for other covered benefits under a health
benefit plan; and
(2) Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable under
a health benefit plan.

SECTION 2. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this
section, the Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement this act.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall
promulgate rules necessary to implement this act that may apply to the
Arkansas Medicaid Program or the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program, § 23-61-1001 et seq.
(3) The State Board of Finance shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this act that may apply to the State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program.
(b) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
commissioner, secretary, and the board shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The commissioner, secretary, and board shall file the proposed
rules with the Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in
advance of January 1, 2026, so that the Legislative Council may consider the
11/25/2024 11:59:36 AM ANS059

HB1052
rules for approval before January 1, 2026.



































11/25/2024 11:59:36 AM ANS059